test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_NoExtra_abwaanaak_gt-norm.yaml
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishinaanibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishinaanibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishinaanibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishiwaaibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishiniibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishiniibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishiniibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishiniibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishiniibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishiniibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishiniibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishiniibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishiniibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishiniibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishiniibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishiniibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
